Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Group Coverage Replacement Act

§ 26-19-201.
Purpose and scope of article.

The purpose of this article is to:

Provide for continuance of coverage for all participants when a succeeding carrier’s contract replaces a prior plan’s benefits; and

Prohibit the imposition of preexisting condition limitations under certain circumstances.

This article is applicable to all insurance policies and subscriber contracts issued or provided by an insurance company or a nonprofit service corporation on a group or group-type basis covering persons as employees of employers or as members of unions, associations, multiple employer trusts or organizations, or any arrangement subject to the jurisdiction of the insurance department.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 134, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of incontestable clause applicable to disability insurance, 67 ALR5th 513.

§ 26-19-202.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Carrier” means an insurance company, nonprofit service corporation, trust, association or other arrangement subject to the jurisdiction of the insurance department;

“Group-type basis” means a benefit plan which meets the following conditions:

Coverage is provided through insurance policies or subscriber contracts to classes of employees or members defined in terms of conditions pertaining to employment or membership or any other arrangement subject to the jurisdiction of the insurance department;

The coverage is not available to the general public and can be obtained and maintained only because of the covered person’s membership in connection with the particular organization or group;

There are arrangements for bulk payment of premiums or subscription charges to the insurer, nonprofit service corporation, association or trust;

There is sponsorship of the plan by the employer, union, association, trust or organization; and

Individually underwritten and issued guaranteed renewable policies shall not be considered “group-type basis” under this paragraph even though purchased through payroll deduction.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 134, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-19-203.
Continuance of coverage where one carrier's contract replaces a plan of similar benefits of another carrier.

In those instances in which one (1) carrier’s contract replaces a plan of similar benefits of another carrier:

The prior carrier remains liable only to the extent of its accrued liabilities and extensions of benefits. The position of the prior carrier shall be the same whether the group policy holder or other entity secures replacement coverage from a new carrier, self-insures or foregoes the provision of coverage;

The succeeding carrier is liable under the following circumstances:

Each person covered under the prior carrier’s plan shall be eligible for complete coverage in accordance with the succeeding carrier’s plan of benefits, which shall include coverage for ninety (90) days for any complication caused as a result of a condition for which benefits were paid under the prior plan within ninety (90) days prior to termination of that plan. Copayment and deductible levels for coverage required under this subparagraph may be applied in a manner consistent with those provided by the succeeding carrier’s plan;

In the case of a preexisting conditions limitation included in the succeeding carrier’s plan, the level of benefits applicable to preexisting conditions of persons becoming covered by the succeeding carrier’s plan in accordance with this paragraph during the period of time this limitation applies under the new plan shall be the lesser of:

The benefits of the new plan determined without application of the preexisting conditions limitations; or

The benefits of the prior plan.

In any situation where a determination of the prior carrier’s benefit is required by the succeeding carrier, at the succeeding carrier’s request the prior carrier shall furnish a statement of the benefits available or pertinent information, sufficient to permit verification of the benefit determination or the determination itself by the succeeding carrier. For the purposes of this section, benefits of the prior plan will be determined in accordance with all of the definitions, conditions and covered expense provisions of the prior plan rather than those of the succeeding plan. The benefit determination will be made as if coverage had not been replaced by the succeeding carrier.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 134, § 1; 2010, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(ii)(A), added “which shall include coverage for ninety (90) days for any complication caused as a result of a condition for which benefits were paid under the prior plan within ninety (90) days prior to termination of that plan.
Copayment and deductible levels for coverage required under this subparagraph may be applied in a manner consistent with those provided by the succeeding carrier's plan.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2010, ch. 104, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to any policy or plan that is delivered, issued, renewed, modified, amended or extended on or after July 1, 2010.”

§ 26-19-204.
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article shall be subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 134, § 1.